src/acro-smj-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON Acronym

 +Use/Circ: FIRSTLETTER ;  ! Dynamically generated acronyms, 	! Remove these from nonrec?
               ! between two and four letters long.
 LETTERNUMBER ; ! Listed (still not monitored)		!
               ! Perhaps we should allow for a final arabic number at
               ! the end of the acronyms, the NRK and NRK2 pattern.
 SOMELONGACRO ; ! Here, we collect some long acronyms, perhaps we should  !
               ! open for dynamic generation of longer acronyms, if this
               ! list gets long.
 smallacro ;    ! This is a pointer to a lexicon of manually listed small-letter
               ! acronyms. They are not generated, since it would interfer with the
               ! ordinary transducer, but listed here, as they then can point to the
               ! same ACRO lexicon as the generated capital-letter acronyms.
! quasiacro ; moved to HyphNouns  ! This is compounds with acronyms in the beginning.
                ! They are here since they make compounds with hyphen to the left.



LEXICON FIRSTLETTER	!^C^
B SCND ; C SCND ; Č SCND ; D  SCND ; Đ SCND ; F  SCND ; G  SCND ; 	!^C^
H SCND ; J SCND ; K  SCND ; L  SCND ; M  SCND ; N  SCND ; Ŋ SCND ; 	!^C^
P SCND ; R SCND ; S  SCND ; Š SCND ; T  SCND ; Ŧ SCND ; V  SCND ; 	!^C^
W SCND ; X SCND ; Z  SCND ; Ž SCND ; 								!^C^
A SCND ; Á SCND ; E  SCND ; I  SCND ; O  SCND ; U  SCND ; 			!^C^
Æ SCND ; Ø SCND ; Y  SCND ; Ä  SCND ; Ö  SCND ; Å  SCND ; 			!^C^

LEXICON SCND			!^C^
B THRD ; C THRD ; Č THRD ; D  THRD ; Đ THRD ; F  THRD ; G  THRD ; 	!^C^
H THRD ; J THRD ; K  THRD ; L  THRD ; M  THRD ; N  THRD ; Ŋ THRD ; 	!^C^
P THRD ; R THRD ; S  THRD ; Š THRD ; T  THRD ; Ŧ THRD ; V  THRD ; 	!^C^
W THRD ; X THRD ; Z  THRD ; Ž THRD ; 								!^C^
A THRD ; Á THRD ; E  THRD ; I  THRD ; O  THRD ; U  THRD ; 			!^C^
Æ THRD ; Ø THRD ; Y  THRD ; Ä  THRD ; Ö  THRD ; Å  THRD ; 			!^C^

LEXICON THRD			!^C^
B FRTH ; C FRTH ; Č FRTH ; D  FRTH ; Đ FRTH ; F  FRTH ; G  FRTH ; 	!^C^
H FRTH ; J FRTH ; K  FRTH ; L  FRTH ; M  FRTH ; N  FRTH ; Ŋ FRTH ; 	!^C^
P FRTH ; R FRTH ; S  FRTH ; Š FRTH ; T  FRTH ; Ŧ FRTH ; V  FRTH ; 	!^C^
W FRTH ; X FRTH ; Z  FRTH ; Ž FRTH ; 								!^C^
A FRTH ; Á FRTH ; E  FRTH ; I  FRTH ; O  FRTH ; U  FRTH ; 			!^C^
Æ FRTH ; Ø FRTH ; Y  FRTH ; Ä  FRTH ; Ö  FRTH ; Å  FRTH ; 			!^C^
  ACRO ;				!^C^

LEXICON FRTH			!^C^
B ACRO ; C ACRO ; Č ACRO ; D  ACRO ; Đ ACRO ; F  ACRO ; G  ACRO ; 	!^C^
H ACRO ; J ACRO ; K  ACRO ; L  ACRO ; M  ACRO ; N  ACRO ; Ŋ ACRO ; 	!^C^
P ACRO ; R ACRO ; S  ACRO ; Š ACRO ; T  ACRO ; Ŧ ACRO ; V  ACRO ; 	!^C^
W ACRO ; X ACRO ; Z  ACRO ; Ž ACRO ; 								!^C^
A ACRO ; Á ACRO ; E  ACRO ; I  ACRO ; O  ACRO ; U  ACRO ; 			!^C^
Æ ACRO ; Ø ACRO ; Y  ACRO ; Ä  ACRO ; Ö  ACRO ; Å  ACRO  ; 			!^C^
ACRO ;				!^C^
! # ; !To prevent cases like :as, `as and as. But this gives tagless 3-letter ACR.

LEXICON ACRO               ! Here we add the POS tag
+N+ACR: acroconnector ;

LEXICON acroconnector     ! Here comes a set of possible symbols to
               acronull ;
         :%>%: acrosuff ; ! put between the abbreviation and its suffix
 +Use/Sub:     acrosuff ; ! The lexica are split in order to avoid the POS
 +Use/Sub:%>'7 acrosuff ; ! tag for other symbols using the acroconnector
 +Use/Sub:%>%` acrosuff ; ! lexicon. (cf. the punct-sme-lex.txt file)
 +Use/Sub:%>%´ acrosuff ;
               RHyph ;    ! Acro compouonds: CD-2
 +Use/Sub:     R ;        ! Without hyphen, not normative:  NRK23

LEXICON acronull
+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%> K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> K ;
+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%> K ;
+Sg+Nom:%>         # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>         # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>         # ;

LEXICON acrosuff
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a    K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:av   K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj   K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:v    K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j    K ;
!+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i    K ; ! NSR:i
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:n    K ; ! NRK:n
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an   K ; ! NRK:an
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:s    K ; ! NRK:s
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as   K ; ! NRK:as
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:jn   K ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n       K ; ! NBR:n
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an      K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:a    K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:aj   K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajt  K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:ajn  K ;
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ajs  K ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:aj   K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:j    K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:jt   K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:jda  K ;
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:jn   K ;
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:js   K ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:j    K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a    # ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:av   # ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj   # ;
 +Sg+Acc:v            # ;
 +Sg+Ill:j            # ;
!+Sg+Ill:i            # ; ! NSR:i
 +Sg+Ine:n            # ; ! NRK:n
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an   # ; ! NRK:an
 +Sg+Ela:s            # ; ! NRK:s
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as   # ; ! NRK:as
 +Sg+Com:jn           # ;
 +Ess:n               # ; ! NBR:n
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an      # ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:a    # ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:aj   # ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajt  # ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajda # ;
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:ajn  # ;
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ajs  # ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:aj   # ;
 +Pl+Gen:j            # ;
 +Pl+Acc:jt           # ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda          # ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn           # ;
 +Pl+Ela:js           # ;
 +Pl+Com:j            # ;

!------Der/r------
 +Der1+Der/r+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:»ár GAHPER ;  !

LEXICON LETTERNUMBER
A4 ACRO ;
A5 ACRO ;
A3 ACRO ;
O97S ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
NRK1 ACRO ;
NRK2 ACRO ;
UTF-8 ACRO ;
TV2 ACRO ;
E6 ACRO ;
LU1 ACRO ;
LU2 ACRO ;
P1 ACRO ;
P2 ACRO ;
A/L ACRO ;
A/S ACRO ;
ECHAM/OPYC3 ACRO ;
L/L ACRO ;
U19 ACRO ;
U-19 ACRO ;
U23 ACRO ;
U-23 ACRO ;
4-A ACRO ;
5-G ACRO ;
2-C ACRO ;
1-D ACRO ;
3-A ACRO ;
6-B ACRO ;
K/S ACRO ;
D/S ACRO ;
S/S ACRO ;
L-97 ACRO ;
L97S ACRO ;
LA21 ACRO ;
O-97 ACRO ;
4/OPYC:4%/OPYC ACRO ;
P3 ACRO ;
CSM_1:CSM%_1 ACRO ;
Jk1 ACRO ;
P4 ACRO ;
P-1 ACRO ;
P-2 ACRO ;
P-3 ACRO ;
P-4 ACRO ;
SVT1 ACRO ;
SVT2 ACRO ;
SVT24 ACRO ;
TV4 ACRO ;
UU2 ACRO ;
Q-2 ACRO ;
T5PC ACRO ;
jo1 ACRO ;
jo2 ACRO ;
jo3 ACRO ;
km/t ACRO ;
km/d ACRO ;
km/h ACRO ;
LEXICON SOMELONGACRO		!^C^
 EXFACFON+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:EXFACFON ACRO;	 !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat			!
 EXFACHS+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:EXFACHS ACRO;	 !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat			!
mánáid-TV ACRO ;
mánáj-TV ACRO ;
tæksta-TV ACRO ;
AB ACRO ;
 BASIC+Use/Sub:BASIC ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
SKINN ACRO ;
BDF ACRO ;
 UNIKOM+Use/Sub:UNIKOM ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
CCITT ACRO ;
 COCOM+Use/Sub:COCOM ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
 FORTRAN+Use/Sub:FORTRAN ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
FUG ACRO ;
MGP ACRO ;
 COMECON+Use/Sub:COMECON ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
ISAN ACRO ;
 UEFA+Use/Sub:UEFA ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
EFS ACRO ;
HV ACRO ;
GSG	ACRO ;
KFK ACRO ;
ICES ACRO ;
BT ACRO ;
EKG ACRO ;
NSR ACRO ;
NRK ACRO ;
NBR ACRO ;
 INTEREG+Use/Sub:INTEREG ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
 NIPIAA+Use/Sub:NIPIAA ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
MD ACRO ;
NOPA ACRO ;
ARN ACRO ;
NTNU ACRO ;
BI ACRO ;
II ACRO ;
UR ACRO ;
UN ACRO ;
EU ACRO ;
TV ACRO ;
III ACRO ;
JA ACRO ;
CD ACRO ;
SKR ACRO ;
ILO ACRO ;
SSO ACRO ;
IL ACRO ;
SMK ACRO ;
SÅG ACRO ;
NRQ ACRO ;
DD ACRO ;
OED ACRO ;
BHD ACRO ;
AD ACRO ;
PM ACRO ;
OT ACRO ;
PPS ACRO ;
SG ACRO ;
SF ACRO ;
SPR ACRO ;
YLE ACRO ;
OG ACRO ;
GLR ACRO ;
FO ACRO ;
HBO ACRO ;
EG ACRO ;
 NAVO+Use/Sub:NAVO ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
NVE ACRO ;
IF ACRO ;
 UNESCO+Use/Sub:UNESCO ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
NEG ACRO ;
SÁB ACRO ;
SEG ACRO ;
SVT ACRO ;
ETS ACRO ;
GOD ACRO ;
VS ACRO ;
FFF ACRO ;
VII ACRO ;
KLM ACRO ;
SJ ACRO ;
VR ACRO ;
AR ACRO ;
JB ACRO ;
NKS ACRO ;
SVL-S ACRO ;
ÁVD ACRO ;
SM ACRO ;
RS ACRO ;
IS ACRO ;
KSS ACRO ;
WHO ACRO ;
FD ACRO ;
VBL ACRO ;
KPK ACRO ;
SSL ACRO ;
VG ACRO ;
FFA ACRO ;
IT ACRO ;
SAS ACRO ;
SSF ACRO ;
SFS ACRO ;
BA ACRO ;
STIL ACRO ;
SF ACRO ;
MNP ACRO ;
TCO ACRO ;
SGS ACRO ;
NOK ACRO ;
NJ ACRO ;
RV ACRO ;
SKES ACRO ;
MK ACRO ;
FAB ACRO ;
POT ACRO ;
OSS ACRO ;
EAI ACRO ;
DSF ACRO ;
OB ACRO ;
KF ACRO ;
NN ACRO ;
SR ACRO ;
MBD ACRO ;
HIV ACRO ;
ISBN ACRO ;
PS ACRO ;
GSS ACRO ;
KUF ACRO ;
SJS ACRO ;
ANS ACRO ;
SNO ACRO ;
RO ACRO ;
SSG ACRO ;
KKS ACRO ;
SNJ ACRO ;
PIL ACRO ;
NÁČ ACRO ;
ILO ACRO ;
BOF ACRO ;
UNTAK ACRO ;
GL ACRO ;
FUOM ACRO ;
ASA ACRO ;
 NORUT+Use/Sub:NORUT ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
LHL ACRO ;
ADHD ACRO ;
SVF ACRO ;
SAK ACRO ;
PETA ACRO ;
MUHTO ACRO ;
DE ACRO ;
BST ACRO ;
SV ACRO ;
PPB ACRO ;
FJ ACRO ;
SOS ACRO ;
NU ACRO ;
MY ACRO ;
HEI ACRO ;
EP ACRO ;
CV ACRO ;
AT ACRO ;
WCIP ACRO ;
SGL ACRO ;
OVDAL ACRO ;
NOS ACRO ;
KOAS ACRO ;
GP ACRO ;
BD ACRO ;
PFU ACRO ;
 INTERREG+Use/Sub:INTERREG ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
ČSV ACRO ;
SMS ACRO ;
PIPE ACRO ;
JUO ACRO ;
IMA ACRO ;
EZLN ACRO ;
DAN ACRO ;
WTO ACRO ;
SOF ACRO ;
RKTL ACRO ;
NSI ACRO ;
MIELDE ACRO ;
LMS ACRO ;
KU ACRO ;
EØS ACRO ;
EGD ACRO ;
DILLI ACRO ;
VIII ACRO ;
TRAS ACRO ;
 NORAD+Use/Sub:NORAD ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NLS ACRO ;
HT ACRO ;
ED ACRO ;
DFD ACRO ;
CNN ACRO ;
AWG ACRO ;
XX ACRO ;
UEW ACRO ;
SP ACRO ;
SE ACRO ;
 SÁLAS+Use/Sub:SÁLAS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KD ACRO ;
ILUS ACRO ;
GPS ACRO ;
 FIFA+Use/Sub:FIFA ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
EEO ACRO ;
BBL ACRO ;
ATSIC ACRO ;
ABC ACRO ;
SN ACRO ;
SISA ACRO ;
SDGB ACRO ;
MNOSS ACRO ;
LU ACRO ;
JL ACRO ;
DSE ACRO ;
 ÁLGU+Use/Sub:ÁLGU ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
TT ACRO ;
SUS ACRO ;
SEK ACRO ;
NASCO ACRO ;
 KRIPOS+Use/Sub:KRIPOS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KGD ACRO ;
HRW ACRO ;
DSJ ACRO ;
BUP ACRO ;
BU ACRO ;
WWM ACRO ;
WINHEC ACRO ;
US ACRO ;
UNEP ACRO ;
SRV ACRO ;
SBSS ACRO ;
NSD ACRO ;
MMI ACRO ;
KIM ACRO ;
HVS ACRO ;
GS ACRO ;
FC ACRO ;
ENA ACRO ;
 EFTA+Use/Sub:EFTA ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
DIR ACRO ;
BNO ACRO ;
APTN ACRO ;
UDSL ACRO ;
SU ACRO ;
SSR ACRO ;
SFR ACRO ;
SAP ACRO ;
RAG ACRO ;
PFL ACRO ;
OLU ACRO ;
NTB ACRO ;
NB ACRO ;
LOBI ACRO ;
KBB ACRO ;
IWGIA ACRO ;
IIIA ACRO ;
GJSL ACRO ;
FPPS ACRO ;
FA ACRO ;
DT ACRO ;
CC ACRO ;
AYC ACRO ;
UNG ACRO ;
UB ACRO ;
SIVA ACRO ;
SGRN ACRO ;
KM ACRO ;
KR ACRO ;
SOR ACRO ;
 SEFO+Use/Sub:SEFO ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 SATØ+Use/Sub:SATØ ACRO; ! SATø
SAF ACRO ;
RNNU ACRO ;
RBK ACRO ;
RSDAP ACRO ;
RMS ACRO ;
TD ACRO ;
ORO ACRO ;
 OASIS+Use/Sub:OASIS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NINA-NIKU ACRO ;
NHO ACRO ;
NAF ACRO ;
DKS ACRO ;
MBL ACRO ;
KLP ACRO ;
KAB ACRO ;
JR ACRO ;
ILAR ACRO ;
GHVS ACRO ;
DUS ACRO ;
DGT ACRO ;
 COOP+Use/Sub:COOP ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
AV ACRO ;
AMT ACRO ;
AÁF ACRO ;
PDF ACRO ;
BPA ACRO ;
WRH ACRO ;
FM ACRO ;
MB ACRO ;
SCA ACRO ;
CNN ACRO ;
IRE ACRO ;
RAF ACRO ;
EØF ACRO ;
LEXICON smallacro
 as ACRO ; !A/S
tv ACRO ;
mánáj-tv:mánáj-tv ACRO ;
Sam^IT ACRO ;
teaksta-tv ACRO ;
AciA ACRO ;
AiS ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
Bbl ACRO ;
DeS ACRO ;
DnB ACRO ;
EtMk ACRO ;
FGb ACRO ;
FoU ACRO ;
FrS ACRO ;
Ger ACRO ;
Gwh ACRO ;
ImO ACRO ;
Ji ACRO ;
KBb ACRO ;
SVL-Fi ACRO ;
KoKS ACRO ;
KrÁ ACRO ;
LaMk ACRO ;
LuW ACRO ;
 Med-fak+Use/Sub:Med-fak ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 Ri^Tø+Use/Sub:Ri^Tø ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NgL ACRO ;
 Norfu+Use/Sub:Norfu ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Rp ACRO ;
pc ACRO ;
SamS ACRO ;
kB ACRO ;
lsd ACRO ;
wc ACRO ;
SfF ACRO ;
Sfruo ACRO ;
SáB ACRO ;
UiT ACRO ;
Rp ACRO ;
UiB ACRO ;
SkL ACRO ;
KrF ACRO ;
